Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-522
Remedies of judgment creditor of associated member or protected-series transferee.

Section 21-142 applies to a judgment creditor of:

(1) an associated member or protected-series transferee of a protected series; or

(2) a series limited liability company, to the extent the company owns a protected-series transferable interest of a protected series.

Laws 2018, LB1121, § 23;

Laws 2019, LB78, § 11.